Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202519-5706
Department of Economic Development; consultation authorized.

The Department of Economic Development may consult with statewide associations representing municipal officials, economic developers, the Department of Transportation, and the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment in order to carry out the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Act.

Laws 2024, LB600, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 44.